Tennessee, session 114, SB2650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-13-405(1), is amended by
deleting "By direct notification," and substituting "By direct notification, including by email, phone
call, and text message,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2650
012584
- 1 -